Utah statutes.
17D-2-103.   Status and authority of a local building authority.

A local building authority:

(1)  is a public entity and an instrumentality of the state, created by a local entity solely for the purpose of constructing, acquiring, improving, or extending, and financing the costs of, one or more projects on behalf of the local entity;

(2)  shall be known as the "Local Building Authority of (name of the creating local entity)"; and

(3)  may:

(a)  as provided in this chapter, construct, acquire, improve, or extend, and finance the costs of, one or more projects on behalf of the creating local entity, in order to accomplish the public purposes for which the creating local entity exists; and

(b)  as provided in Part 5, Local Building Authority Bonds, issue and sell its bonds for the purpose of paying the costs of constructing, acquiring, improving, or extending a project.



Enacted by Chapter 360, 2008 General Session

